Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB820.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5731(c) of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5731. Poisonous or deleterious substances and tolerances.* * *(c) Unsafe food additives.--(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to prohibit the use of certain harmful substances as food additives or color additives in the manufacture and commercial distribution of food products and require companies to disclose their "Generally Recognized as Safe" (GRAS) food ingredients to the public.(2) A food additive shall, with respect to any particular use or intended use, be deemed to be unsafe for 123456789101112131415161718 the purposes of the application of section 5728(4) (relating to adulteration of food) unless it and its intended use conform to the terms of an exemption which is in effect under this section or unless there is in effect, and it and its intended use are in conformity with, a regulation issued under this section prescribing the conditions under which the additive may be safely used. A food which is in compliance with a regulation relating to a food additive shall not, by reason of bearing or containing an additive in accordance with the regulations, be considered adulterated within the meaning of section 5728(4).(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the following food additives shall, with respect to any particular use or intended use, be deemed to be unsafe for the purposes of the application of section 5728(4):(i) Brominated vegetable oil.(ii) Potassium bromate.(iii) Butylated hydroxyanisole and hydroxytoluene.(iv) Red dye 3.(v) Red dye 40.(vi) Yellow dye 5.(vii) Yellow dye 6.(viii) Blue dye 1.(ix) Blue dye 2.(x) Green dye 3.(xi) Propylparaben.(xii) Titanium dioxide.(xiii) Citrus red No. 2.(xiv) Orange dye B.(xv) High fructose corn syrup.20250SB0820PN0891 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xvi) Monosodium glutamate.(xvii) Artificial trans fats.(xviii) Azodicarbonamide.(xix) Transglutaminase.Section 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.20250SB0820PN0891 - 3 - 12345